District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-129.07

Tax-exempt status.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 17
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-226, § 102, 51 DCR 10539
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884